Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.286

Rights reserved to the legislature—No future contractual rights.

The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal the reimbursement provisions of chapter 488, Laws of 2007 in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive any distribution not granted prior to that time.

[ 2007 c 488 s 4.]

NOTES:

Short title—2007 c 488: See note following RCW 43.43.285.